Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8703
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Patient Safety Improvement Act are to (1) encourage a culture of safety and quality by providing for legal protection of information reported for the purposes of quality improvement and patient safety, (2) provide for the reporting of aggregate information about occurrences, and (3) provide for the reporting and sharing of information designed to improve health care delivery systems and reduce the incidence of adverse health events and near misses. The ultimate goal of the act is to ensure the safety of all individuals who seek health care in Nebraska's health care facilities or from Nebraska's health care professionals.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 3.